apertium-wal.wal.lexc
LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>:%> VERB-INFL ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>:%>%{tv%} VERB-INFL ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>:%> VERB-INFL ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>:%>%{tv%} VERB-INFL ;

LEXICON V-ITV   ! Lexicon for transitivised verbs

%<v%>%<tv%>:%> VERB-INFL ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS   ! Lexicon for passive stems of verbs

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>ett%> VERB-Pass-endings ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS-ETT  ! Lexicon for passive forms of verbs

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%> VERB-Pass-endings ;

LEXICON VERB-INFL

VERB-Imfr ;		!Imperfective Verb Inflection
VERB-NegImfr ;		!Negative Imperfective Verb Inflection
VERB-IntrImfr ;		!Introgative Imperfective Verb Inflection
VERB-NegIntrImfr ;	!Negative Introgative Imperfective Verb Inflection
VERB-Prf ;		!Perfective Verb Inflection
VERB-NegPrf ;		!Negative Perfective Verb Inflection
VERB-IntrPrf ;		!Introgative Perfective Verb Inflection
VERB-NegIntrPrf ;	!Negative Introgative Perfective Verb Inflection
VERB-Fut ;		!Future Verb Inflection
VERB-IntFut ;		!Introgative Future Verb Inflection
VERB-Opt ;		!Optative Verb Inflection
VERB-NegOpt ;		!Negative Optative Verb Inflection
VERB-IntrEnding ;	!Introgative Ending Verb Inflection
VERB-ShortCnvb 	;	!Short Converb Inflection
VERB-LongCnvb ;		!Long Converb Inflection
VERB-Simu ;		!Simutaneous Inflection
VERB-Rel ;		!Relative Inflection
VERB-Inf ;		!Infinitive Inflection
!VERB-Nmlz ;		!Nominalizer Inflection
!VERB-Pass ;		!Passive Verb Inflection
!VERB-Pass-endings ;	!Passive Endings
VERB-Cau ;		!Causative Inflection
!VERB-Cau-endings ;	!Causative Endings


LEXICON VERB-Imfr

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<imfr%>:ays # ;			
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<imfr%>:eettees # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<imfr%>:oos # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<imfr%>:aasa # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<imfr%>:eeta # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<imfr%>:awsu # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<imfr%>:ees # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<imfr%>:oosona # ;

LEXICON VERB-NegImfr

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:ikke # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:okko # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:ettenna # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:akka # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:ekketa # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:ukku # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:enna # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<imfr%>:okkona # ;

LEXICON VERB-IntrImfr

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:iyanaa # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:iyo # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:iyonii # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ay # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:eetii # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ay # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ii # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:iyonaa # ;

LEXICON VERB-NegIntrImfr

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ikkinaa # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:okkonii # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ettennee # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ikkii # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ekketii # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ekkee # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:ennee # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<imfr%>:okkonaa # ;

LEXICON VERB-Prf

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<prf%>:aas # ;
%<p1%>%<sing%>%<prf%>:aasi # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<prf%>:ida # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<prf%>:adasa # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<prf%>:ideta # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<prf%>:aasu # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<prf%>:iis # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<prf%>:iisi # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<prf%>:idosona # ;

LEXICON VERB-NegPrf

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:abeikke # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:ibeokko # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:ibeettenna # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:abeakka # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:ibeekketa # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<fem%>%<prf%>:abeukku # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:ibeenna # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<prf%>:ibeokkona # ;

LEXICON VERB-IntrPrf

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:idanaa # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ido # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:idonii # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:adii # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:idetii # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:adee # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:idee # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:idonaa # ;

LEXICON VERB-NegIntrPrf

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:abeikkinaa # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ibeokkonii # ;
%<p1%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ibeettennee # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:abeikkii # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ibeekketii # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:abeekkee # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ibeennee # ;
%<p3%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<intr%>%<prf%>:ibeokkonaa # ;

LEXICON VERB-Fut

%<fut%>:ana # ;

LEXICON VERB-IntFut

%<intr%>%<fut%>:anne # ;

LEXICON VERB-Opt

%<p2%>%<sing%>%<opt%>:a # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<opt%>:ite # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<opt%>:u # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<opt%>:o # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<opt%>:ona # ;

LEXICON VERB-NegOpt

%<p2%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<opt%>:oppa # ;
%<p2%>%<plr%>%<neg%>%<opt%>:oppite # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<neg%>%<opt%>:uppu # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<neg%>%<opt%>:oppo # ;
%<p3%>%<sing%>%<neg%>%<opt%>:oppona # ;

LEXICON VERB-IntrEnding

%<p1%>%<sing%>%<intrEnding%>:oo # ;
%<p2%>%<sing%>%<intrEnding%>:uutee # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<intrEnding%>:uuteetii # ;

LEXICON VERB-ShortCnvb 

%<shortcnvb%>%<p1%>%<sing%>:a # ;			 
%<shortcnvb%>%<p1%>%<plr%>:i # ;
%<shortcnvb%>%<p2%>%<plr%>:i # ;		
%<shortcnvb%>%<p2%>%<sing%>:a # ;
%<shortcnvb%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>:a # ;
%<shortcnvb%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>:i # ;
%<shortcnvb%>%<p3%>%<plr%>:i # ;

LEXICON VERB-LongCnvb

%<longcnvb%>%<p1%>%<sing%>:ada # ;			
%<longcnvb%>%<p1%>%<plr%>:idi # ;
%<longcnvb%>%<p2%>%<plr%>:idi # ;
%<longcnvb%>%<p2%>%<sing%>:ada # ;
%<longcnvb%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>:ada # ;
%<longcnvb%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>:idi # ;
%<longcnvb%>%<p3%>%<plr%>:idi # ;

LEXICON VERB-Simu            ! simu expresses while

%<simu%>%<p1%>%<sing%>:aydaa # ;
%<simu%>%<p1%>%<plr%>:iiddi # ;
%<simu%>%<p2%>%<sing%>:aydaa # ;
%<simu%>%<p2%>%<plr%>:iiddi # ;
%<simu%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<fem%>:aydaa # ;
%<simu%>%<p3%>%<sing%>%<masc%>:iiddi # ;
%<simu%>%<p3%>%<plr%>:iiddi # ;

LEXICON VERB-Rel   			! how to direct to nmlz   -  Verbal Adjective <gpr>

%<rel%>%<impf%>%<sub%>:iya Nmlz ; 
%<rel%>%<prf%>%<sub%>:o Nmlz ;
%<rel%>%<prf%>%<sub%>:ido Nmlz ;
%<rel%>%<impf%>%<nsub%>:iyo Nmlz ;
%<rel%>%<prf%>%<nsub%>:a Nmlz ;
%<rel%>%<prf%>%<nsub%>:ida Nmlz ;
%<rel%>%<fut%>:aanaa Nmlz ;

LEXICON VERB-Inf

%<inf%>%<abs%>:ana # ; 
%<inf%>%<abs%>%<sg%>:anaa # ; 
%<inf%>%<obl%>:ana # ; 
%<inf%>%<obl%>%<sg%>:anaa # ; 
%<inf%>%<nom%>%<sg%>:anai # ; 
%<inf%>%<inter%>:anee # ; 

LEXICON Nmlz                      ! This is Gerund / Verbal Noun: <ger>

%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<abs%>:gaa # ;
%<nmlz%>%<plr%>%<masc%>%<abs%>:geeta # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<abs%>:ro # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<obl%>:gaa POSTPOS ;
%<nmlz%>%<plr%>%<masc%>%<obl%>:geetu POSTPOS ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<obl%>:ri POSTPOS ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<nom%>:gee # ;
%<nmlz%>%<plr%>%<masc%>%<nom%>:geeti # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<nom%>:ra # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<inter%>:gee # ;
%<nmlz%>%<plr%>%<masc%>%<inter%>:geetee # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<inter%>:ri # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<masc%>%<voc%>:goo # ;
%<nmlz%>%<plr%>%<masc%>%<voc%>:geetoo # ;
%<nmlz%>%<sing%>%<fem%>%<voc%>:ree # ;

LEXICON VERB-Cau

%<cau%>:iss%> VERB-Cau-endings ;

LEXICON VERB-Cau-endings

VERB-Imfr ;
VERB-NegImfr ;
VERB-IntrImfr ;
VERB-NegIntrImfr ;
VERB-Prf ;
VERB-NegPrf ;
VERB-IntrPrf ;
VERB-NegIntrPrf ;
VERB-Fut ;
VERB-IntFut ;
VERB-Opt ;
VERB-NegOpt ;
VERB-IntrEnding ;
VERB-ShortCnvb ;
VERB-LongCnvb ;
VERB-Simu ;
VERB-Rel ;

!LEXICON VERB-Pass

!%<pass%>:ett VERB-Pass-endings ;

LEXICON VERB-Pass-endings

VERB-Imfr ;
VERB-NegImfr ;
VERB-IntrImfr ;
VERB-NegIntrImfr ;
VERB-Prf ;
VERB-NegPrf ;
VERB-IntrPrf ;
VERB-NegIntrPrf ;
VERB-Fut ;
VERB-IntFut ;
VERB-Opt ;
VERB-NegOpt ;
VERB-IntrEnding ;
VERB-ShortCnvb ;
VERB-LongCnvb ;
VERB-Simu ;
VERB-Rel ;

LEXICON VerbRoot	
aakk:aass V-ITV ; ! "make wide"
aduqq:aduss V-ITV ; ! "make longer"
afuxx:afuxx V-IV ; ! "cry"
ammantt:ammantt V-IV ; ! "convince"
att:ashsh V-ITV ; ! "save (from)"
awaxx:awaxx V-IV ; ! "shine"
baʼʼ:baʼʼ V-IV ; ! "be successful"
barott:barott V-IV ; ! "have leprosy"
beʼ:be V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
binjjill:binjjill  V-IV ; ! "be rigid"
booddil:booddil V-IV ; ! "be barren"
borss:borss V-IV ; ! "be shameful"
burkkukk:burkkukk V-IV ; ! "be fat"
cancc:cancc V-IV ; ! "clamor, vocalize"
ciqqatt:ciqqatt  V-IV ; ! "be mucky"
daabidaab:daabidaab V-IV ; ! "be invisible"
dalqqidalqq:dalqqidalqq V-IV ; ! "be lush (of plants)"
dicc:dicc V-IV ; ! "increase, add"
doogg:doogg V-IV ; ! "stumble, stammer"
doom:doom V-TV-PASS ; ! "be launched"
eell:eell V-IV ; ! "be collected (water)"
gaariq:gaariq V-IV ; ! "be blackened"
gangg:gangg V-IV ; ! "be curved"
gaytalatt:gaytalatt  V-IV ; ! "loiter dawdle"
giirett:giirett V-IV ; ! "be paid"
goob:goob V-IV ; ! "be clever"
goshoshatt:goshoshatt  V-IV ; ! "stroll move"
guurumm:guurumm V-IV ; ! "snarl, growl"
han:han V-IV ; ! "happen, become"
helʼʼ:helʼʼ V-IV ; ! "pant, breathe with difficulty"
holssatt:holssatt  V-IV ; ! "shed, weep"
hurqqatt:hurqqatt  V-IV ; ! "be weak"
jaggott:jaggott V-IV ; ! "babble"
kaay:kaay V-IV ; ! "foretell"
kawyy:kawyy V-IV ; ! "be light"
koldd:koldd V-IV ; ! "be loose"
lacott:lacott V-IV ; ! "be/flammable"
lososs:lososs V-IV ; ! "be slender"
masunxx:masunxx V-IV ; ! "injure, wound"
molssoss:molssoss V-IV ; ! "look beautiful"
ool:ool V-IV ; ! "moan, groan"
piig:piig V-IV ; ! "run, scuttle"
purcc:purcc V-IV ; ! "regrow (grass)"
qirxxat:qirxxat V-IV ; ! "be fat"
salddadd:salddadd V-IV ; ! "be perfect"
shacc:shacc V-IV ; ! "boast, fuss"
shoppatt:shoppatt  V-IV ; ! "be spilled"
suuxx:suuxx V-IV ; ! "bleed"
tiicitiic:tiicitiic V-IV ; ! "be conceited"
ulott:ulott V-IV ; ! "be confidant"
worakkaab:worakkaab  V-IV ; ! "rebel refuse"
xib:xib V-IV ; ! "rebel refuse"
yaag:yaag V-IV ; ! "be said"
yuuy:yuuy V-IV ; ! "wander travel"
zom:zom  V-IV ; ! "be lazy"
al:al V-TV ; ! "mourn singing"
arac:arac V-TV ; ! "spray sprinkle"
azaz:azaz V-TV ; ! "order command"
bar:bar V-TV ; ! "cover close"
bess:bess V-TV ; ! "show imply"
bol:bol V-TV ; ! "warm up"
borinashsh:borinashsh V-TV ; ! "criticize"
buraat:buraat V-TV ; ! "prepare barley"
caccaf:caccaf V-TV ; ! "splash sprinkle"
ceeqq:ceeqq V-TV ; ! "depend (on)"
daabul:daabul V-TV ; ! "double Kaalliya"
darcc:darcc V-TV ; ! "leave grass"
dinnaaq:dinnaaq V-TV ; ! "disrupt I"
duuqq:duuqq V-TV ; ! "draw haul"
er:er V-TV ; ! "make gruel"
gaaxx:gaaxx V-TV ; ! "buy quantitatively"
gel:gel V-TV ; ! "insert let"
gel:gel V-TV-PASS ; ! "be inserted"
goochch:goochch V-TV ; ! "pull jerk"
haar:haar V-TV ; ! "pile hoard"
harshshuush:harshshuush V-TV ; ! "hate resent"
hoshkkay:hoshkkay V-TV ; ! "tell tell"
imm:im V-TV-PASS ; ! "give offer"
kaaf:kaaf V-TV ; ! "support favour"
kaal:kaal V-TV-PASS ; ! "lead guide"
kawshsh:kawshsh V-TV ; ! "humiliate shame"
koos:koos V-TV ; ! "roast"
laagg:laagg V-TV ; ! "drive Ne"
lax:lax V-TV ; ! "scorch burn"
luukk:luukk V-TV ; ! "excel win"
mammot:mammot V-TV ; ! "hesitate Ta"
meezey:meezey V-TV ; ! "train skill"
mogol:mogol V-TV ; ! "ruin crumble"
muuc:muuc V-TV ; ! "behead"
onccilatt:onccilatt V-TV ; ! "be ugly"
peegaam:peegaam V-TV ; ! "be furious"
pixir:pixir V-TV ; ! "poke push"
pol:pol V-TV-PASS ; ! "execute perform"
puulatt:puulatt V-TV ; ! "be attractive"
qachch:qash V-TV-PASS ; ! "tie fasten"
qar:qar V-TV ; ! "have compassion"
qizagg:qizagg V-TV ; ! "cut"
qucc:qucc V-TV ; ! "wipe clean"
shaah:shaah V-TV ; ! "be isolated"
shher:shher V-TV ; ! "attach mend"
shuuy:shuuy V-TV ; ! "bead thread"
siiq:siiq V-TV-PASS ; ! "be loved"
sug:sug V-TV ; ! "push shove"
tim:tim V-TV ; ! "end complete"
ucc:ucc V-TV ; ! "collect gather"
wayss:wayss V-TV ; ! "baffle bewilder"
wuxaawux:wuxaawux V-TV ; ! "wave shake"
xeell:xeell V-TV-PASS ; ! "be watched"
xexxeef:xexxeef V-TV ; ! "use up"
xundduq:xundduq V-TV ; ! "pinch nip"
yer:yer V-TV ; ! "be trampled"
zaar:zaar V-TV ; ! "repeat"
zaar:zaar V-TV-PASS ; ! "be returned"
zugg:zugg V-TV ; ! "crouch ambush"
m:meetett V-TV-PASS-ETT ; ! "to eat"
d:deetett V-TV-PASS-ETT ; ! "to exist, live"
eh:eheetett V-TV-PASS-ETT ; ! "to bring"
